North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-17 Physicians and Surgeons
43-17-31.
Grounds for disciplinary action.

Disciplinary action may be imposed against a physician upon any of the following grounds:

The use of any false, fraudulent, or forged statement or document, or the use of any fraudulent, deceitful, dishonest, or immoral practice, in connection with any of the licensing requirements.

The making of false or misleading statements about the physician’s skill or the efficacy of any medicine, treatment, or remedy.

The conviction of any misdemeanor determined by the board to have a direct bearing upon a person’s ability to serve the public as a practitioner of medicine or any felony. A license may not be withheld contrary to the provisions of chapter 12.1-33.

Habitual use of alcohol or drugs.

Physical or mental disability materially affecting the ability to perform the duties of a physician in a competent manner.

The performance of any dishonorable, unethical, or unprofessional conduct likely to deceive, defraud, or harm the public.

Obtaining any fee by fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation.

Aiding or abetting the practice of medicine by an unlicensed, incompetent, or impaired person.

The violation of any provision of a medical practice act or the rules and regulations of the board, or any action, stipulation, condition, or agreement imposed by the board or its investigative panels.

The practice of medicine under a false or assumed name.

The advertising for the practice of medicine in an untrue or deceptive manner.

The representation to a patient that a manifestly incurable condition, sickness, disease, or injury can be cured.

The willful or negligent violation of the confidentiality between physician and patient, except as required by law.

The failure of a doctor of osteopathy to designate that person’s school of practice in the professional use of that person’s name by such terms as “osteopathic physician and surgeon”, “doctor of osteopathy”, “D.O.”, or similar terms.

Gross negligence in the practice of medicine.

Sexual abuse, misconduct, or exploitation related to the licensee’s practice of medicine.

The prescription, sale, administration, distribution, or gift of any drug legally classified as a controlled substance or as an addictive or dangerous drug for other than medically accepted therapeutic purposes.

The payment or receipt, directly or indirectly, of any fee, commission, rebate, or other compensation for medical services not actually or personally rendered, or for patient referrals; this prohibition does not affect the lawful distributions of professional partnerships, corporations, limited liability companies, or associations.

The failure to comply with the reporting requirements of section 43-17.1-05.1.

The failure to transfer medical records to another physician or to supply copies of those records to the patient or to the patient’s representative when requested to do so by the patient or the patient’s designated representative, except if the disclosure is otherwise limited or prohibited by law. A reasonable charge for record copies may be assessed.

A continued pattern of inappropriate care as a physician, including unnecessary surgery.

The use of any false, fraudulent, or deceptive statement in any document connected with the practice of medicine.

The prescribing, selling, administering, distributing, or giving to oneself or to one’s spouse or child any drug legally classified as a controlled substance or recognized as an addictive or dangerous drug.

The violation of any state or federal statute or regulation relating to controlled substances.

The imposition by another state or jurisdiction of disciplinary action against a license or other authorization to practice medicine based upon acts or conduct by the physician that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action as set forth in this section. A certified copy of the record of the action taken by the other state or jurisdiction is conclusive evidence of that action.

The lack of appropriate documentation in medical records for diagnosis, testing, and treatment of patients.

The failure to properly monitor a fluoroscopy technologist or an emergency medical technician.

The failure to furnish the board or the investigative panel, their investigators, or representatives information legally requested by the board or the investigative panel.

The performance of an abortion on a pregnant woman prior to determining if the unborn child the pregnant woman is carrying has a detectable heartbeat, as provided in subsection 1 of section 14-02.1-05.1.

Noncompliance with the physician health program established under chapter 43-17.3.

The board shall keep a record of all of its proceedings in the matter of suspending, revoking, or refusing licenses together with the evidence offered.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 93, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 277; R.C. 1899, § 277; S.L. 1905, ch. 148, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 296; S.L. 1911, ch. 189, § 11; C.L. 1913, § 468; R.C. 1943, § 43-1731; S.L. 1957, ch. 302, § 13; 1957 Supp., § 43-1731; S.L. 1969, ch. 395, § 6; 1975, ch. 406, § 1; 1977, ch. 130, § 30; 1981, ch. 435, § 9; 1983, ch. 479, § 2; 1987, ch. 525, § 12; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 426, § 5; 1997, ch. 373, § 1; 1999, ch. 380, § 5; 2001, ch. 378, § 2; 2003, ch. 225, § 5; 2013, ch. 119, § 3; 2017, ch. 289, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 355, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Definition of offense, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-01-04.

Participation in abortion not mandatory, see N.D.C.C. § 23-16-14.

43-17-31.1.
Costs of prosecution — Disciplinary proceedings.

In any order or decision issued by the board in resolution of a disciplinary proceeding in which disciplinary action is imposed against a physician or physician assistant, the board may direct any physician or physician assistant to pay the board a sum not to exceed the reasonable and actual costs, including reasonable attorney’s fees, incurred by the board and investigative panels of the board in the investigation and prosecution of the case. If applicable, the physician’s or physician assistant’s license may be suspended until the costs are paid to the board. A physician or physician assistant may challenge the reasonableness of any cost item in a hearing under chapter 28-32 before an administrative law judge. The administrative law judge may approve, deny, or modify any cost item, and the determination of the judge is final. The hearing must occur before the physician’s license or physician assistant’s license may be suspended for nonpayment.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 462, § 1; 2001, ch. 378, § 3; 2019, ch. 355, § 6, effective August 1, 2019.

43-17-31.2.
Limitations on disciplinary actions.

The board may not take disciplinary action against a licensee based solely on the licensee prescribing or dispensing ivermectin for the off-label treatment or prevention of severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 identified as SARS-CoV-2, or any mutation or viral fragments of SARS-CoV-2. This section does not limit the board from taking a disciplinary action on another basis, such as unlicensed practice, inappropriate documentation, or substandard care, or any basis that would in the board’s determination harm the patient.

Source:

S.L. 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 559, § 3, effective November 15, 2021.

43-17-32.
Appeal from decision of board refusing, suspending, or revoking a license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 525, § 13.

43-17-32.1.
Temporary suspension — Appeal.

When, based on verified evidence, the board determines by a clear and convincing standard that the evidence presented to the board indicates that the continued practice by the physician would create a significant risk of serious and ongoing harm to the public while a disciplinary proceeding is pending, and that immediate suspension of the physician’s license is required to reasonably protect the public from that risk of harm, the board may order a temporary suspension ex parte. For purposes of this section, “verified evidence” means testimony taken under oath and based on personal knowledge. The board shall give prompt written notice of the suspension to the physician, which must include a copy of the order and complaint, the date set for a full hearing, and a specific description of the nature of the evidence, including a list of all known witnesses and a description of any documents relied upon by the board in ordering the temporary suspension which, upon request, must be made available to the physician.

An ex parte temporary suspension remains in effect until a final order is issued after a full hearing or appeal under this section or until the suspension is otherwise terminated by the board.

The board shall conduct a hearing on the merits of the allegations to determine what disciplinary action, if any, shall be taken against the physician who is the subject of the ex parte suspension. That hearing must be held not later than thirty days from the issuance of the ex parte temporary suspension order. The physician is entitled to a continuance of the thirty-day period upon request for a period determined by the hearing officer.

The physician may appeal the ex parte temporary suspension order prior to the full hearing. For purposes of appeal, the district court shall decide whether the board acted reasonably or arbitrarily. The court shall give priority to the appeal for prompt disposition thereof.

Any medical record of a patient, or other document containing personal information about a patient, which is obtained by the board is an exempt record as defined in section 44-04-17.1.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 482, § 1; 1993, ch. 426, § 6; 1997, ch. 373, § 2; 2001, ch. 378, § 4; 2001, ch. 393, § 2.

43-17-33.
Use of fraudulent device in obtaining a license — Fraudulent impersonation of physician — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 525, § 13.

43-17-34.
Practicing without a license — Violation of chapter — Penalty.

Any person who practices medicine in this state without complying with the provisions of this chapter, and any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter for which another penalty is not specified is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. In addition to the criminal penalties provided, the civil remedy of injunction is available to restrain and enjoin violations of any provisions of this chapter without proof of actual damages sustained by any person.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 93, § 6; R.C. 1895, § 280; R.C. 1899, § 280; S.L. 1905, ch. 148, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 299; S.L. 1911, ch. 189, § 13; C.L. 1913, § 470; R.C. 1943, § 43-1734; S.L. 1957, ch. 302, § 15; 1957 Supp., § 43-1734; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 486; 1983, ch. 480, § 1.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Collateral References.

Separate or continuing offense, practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry or other healing arts as, 99 A.L.R.2d 654.

Acupuncture as illegal practice of medicine, 72 A.L.R.3d 1257.

43-17-35.
Enforcement of chapter — Duty of secretary-treasurer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 525, § 13.

43-17-36.
Physician practicing medicine while intoxicated. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 525, § 13.

43-17-37.
Emergency treatment by resident physician.

Any physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of this chapter who in good faith renders in this state emergency care at the scene of the emergency is expected to render only such emergency care as in the person’s judgment is at the time indicated.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 287, § 1.

Cross-References.

Physician acting pursuant to N.D.C.C. §§ 43-17-37 and 43-17-38 excluded from motor vehicle accident “good Samaritan” provision, see N.D.C.C. § 39-08-04.1.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of “good Samaritan” statutes, 68 A.L.R.4th 294.

Law Reviews.

For Case Comment: Health – Medical Malpractice Defenses: Applying Good Samaritan Laws to In-Hospital Emergencies (Chamley V. Khokha, 2007 Nd 69, 730 N.W.2d 864), see 84 N.D. L. Rev. 535 (2008).

43-17-38.
Emergency treatment by nonresident physician.

Any physician or surgeon duly licensed to practice as a physician or surgeon in another state of the United States who renders in this state emergency care at the scene of the emergency may only be held to the degree of care as specified in section 43-17-37, and may not be deemed to be practicing medicine within this state as contemplated by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 287, § 2.

Law Reviews.

For Case Comment: Health — Medical Malpractice Defenses: Applying Good Samaritan Laws to In-Hospital Emergencies (Chamley v. Khokha, 2007 ND 69, 730 N.W.2d 864), see 84 N.D. L. Rev. 535 (2008).

43-17-39.
Qualified doctors of osteopathy may be licensed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 525, § 13.

43-17-40.
Limitation of liability — Legislative intent.

No physician, surgeon, hospital, blood bank, tissue bank, or other person or entity who donates, obtains, prepares, transplants, injects, transfuses, or otherwise transfers, or who assists or participates in obtaining, preparing, transplanting, injecting, transfusing, or transferring any tissue, organ, blood, or component thereof from one or more human beings, living or dead, to another human being, may be liable as the result of any such activity, save and except that each such person or entity remains liable for the person’s or entity’s own negligence or willful misconduct only.

The availability of scientific knowledge, skills, and materials for the transplantation, injection, transfusion, or transfer of human tissue, organs, blood, and components thereof is important to the health and welfare of the people of this state. The imposition of legal liability without fault upon the persons and organizations engaged in such scientific procedures inhibits the exercise of sound medical judgment and restricts the availability of important scientific knowledge, skills, and materials. It is therefore the public policy of this state to promote the health and welfare of the people by limiting the legal liability arising out of such scientific procedures to instances of negligence or willful misconduct.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 439, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References.

Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-06.2.

Collateral References.

Tort liability of physician or hospital in connection with organ or tissue transplant procedures, 76 A.L.R.3d 890.

Death: test of death for organ transplant purposes, 76 A.L.R.3d 913.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other individual medical practitioner for injury or death resulting from blood transfusion, 20 A.L.R.4th 136.

Liability of blood supplier or donor for injury or death resulting from blood transfusion, 24 A.L.R.4th 508.

Discovery of identity of blood donors, 56 A.L.R.4th 755.

Propriety of surgically invading incompetent or minor for benefit of third party, 4 A.L.R.5th 1000.

Physician’s use of patient’s tissues, cells, or bodily substances for medical research or economic purposes, 16 A.L.R.5th 143.

Liability for donee’s contraction of Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS) from blood transfusion, 64 A.L.R.5th 333.

Liability of hospital or medical practitioner under doctrine of strict liability in tort, or breach of warranty, for harm caused by drug, medical instrument, or similar device used in treating patient, 65 A.L.R.5th 357.

Validity, construction, and application of blood shield statutes, 75 A.L.R.5th 229.

43-17-41.
Duty of physicians and others to report injury — Penalty.

Any physician, physician assistant, naturopath licensed under chapter 43-58, acupuncturist licensed under chapter 43-61, or any individual licensed under chapter 43-12.1 who performs any diagnosis or treatment for any individual suffering from any wound, injury, or other physical trauma:

Inflicted by the individual’s own act or by the act of another by means of a knife, gun, or pistol shall as soon as practicable report the wound, injury, or trauma to a law enforcement agency in the county in which the care was rendered; or

Which the individual performing diagnosis or treatment has reasonable cause to suspect was inflicted in violation of any criminal law of this state, shall as soon as practicable report the wound, injury, or trauma to a law enforcement agency in the county in which the care was rendered.

The report under subsection 1 must state the name of the injured individual and the character and extent of the individual’s injuries, except when the individual’s physical injury is the result of a sexual offense, as defined in chapter 12.1-20, in which case the individual’s name, address, and any identifying information may not be included in the report without the individual’s written release.

When a report of domestic violence, as defined in section 14-07.1-01, or a report of physical injury resulting from a sexual offense, as defined in chapter 12.1-20, is made to a law enforcement agency as required by this section, the injured individual must be provided with information regarding a domestic violence sexual assault organization as defined in section 14-07.1-01 or other victims’ assistance program by the physician, physician assistant, naturopath, acupuncturist licensed under chapter 43-61, or any individual licensed under chapter 43-12.1, unless it is known that the information has previously been provided to the injured individual.

The reports mandated by this section must be made as soon as practicable and may be either oral or in writing. Oral reports must be followed by written reports within forty-eight hours if so requested by the sheriff or state’s attorney to whom the oral report is originally made.

Any individual required to report as provided by this section who willfully fails to do so is guilty of an infraction.

Any individual making or not making a report in good faith pursuant to this section is immune from liability for making or not making a report.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 403, § 1; 2001, ch. 379, § 1; 2011, ch. 331, § 2; 2015, ch. 298, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 308, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Child abuse or neglect, duty to report, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-25.1.

Collateral References.

Products liability, sufficiency of evidence to support product misuse defense in action concerning weapons and ammunition, 59 A.L.R.4th 102.

43-17-42.
Employment of physicians by hospitals — Employment of physicians by nonprofit entities and charitable trusts for hyperbaric oxygen therapy.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a hospital licensed under chapter 23-16 may employ directly or indirectly a physician if the employment relationship between the physician and hospital is evidenced by a written contract. The written contract must contain language to the effect the hospital’s employment relationship with the physician may not affect the exercise of the physician’s independent judgment in the practice of medicine, and the physician’s independent judgment in the practice of medicine is in fact unaffected by the physician’s employment relationship with the hospital. Under this subsection a hospital is not engaged in the practice of medicine.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a nonprofit entity or charitable trust may employ directly or indirectly a physician to conduct hyperbaric oxygen therapy if the employment relationship between the physician and nonprofit entity or charitable trust is evidenced by a written contract. The written contract must contain language to the effect the nonprofit entity’s or charitable trust’s employment relationship with the physician may not affect the exercise of the physician’s independent judgment in the practice of medicine, and the physician’s independent judgment in the practice of medicine is in fact unaffected by the physician’s employment relationship with the nonprofit entity or charitable trust. Under this subsection a nonprofit entity or charitable trust is not engaged in the practice of medicine.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 460, § 1; 1993, ch. 429, § 1; 2021, ch. 314, § 1, effective April 1, 2021.

43-17-43.
Topical fluoride varnish.

A licensed physician or physician assistant may apply topical fluoride varnish to an individual in accordance with rules adopted by the board.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 368, § 1.

43-17-44.
Standard of care and professional ethics.

A licensee is held to the same standard of care and same ethical standards, whether practicing traditional in-person medicine or telemedicine. The following apply in the context of telemedicine:

Professional ethical standards require a practitioner to practice only in areas in which the practitioner has demonstrated competence, based on the practitioner’s training, ability, and experience. In assessing a licensee’s compliance with this ethical requirement, the board shall give consideration to board certifications and specialty groups’ telemedicine standards.

A licensee practicing telemedicine shall establish a bona fide relationship with the patient before the diagnosis or treatment of a patient. A licensee practicing telemedicine shall verify the identity of the patient seeking care and shall disclose, and ensure the patient has the ability to verify, the identity and licensure status of any licensee providing medical services to the patient.

Before initially diagnosing or treating a patient for a specific illness or condition, an examination or evaluation must be performed. An examination or evaluation may be performed entirely through telemedicine, if the examination or evaluation is equivalent to an in-person examination.

An examination utilizing secure videoconferencing or store-and-forward technology for appropriate diagnostic testing and use of peripherals that would be deemed necessary in a like in-person examination or evaluation meets this standard, as does an examination conducted with an appropriately licensed intervening health care provider, practicing within the scope of the provider’s profession, providing necessary physical findings to the licensee. An examination or evaluation consisting only of a static online questionnaire or an audio conversation does not meet the standard of care.

Once a licensee conducts an acceptable examination or evaluation, whether in-person or by telemedicine, and establishes a patient-licensee relationship, subsequent followup care may be provided as deemed appropriate by the licensee, or by a provider designated by the licensee to act temporarily in the licensee’s absence. In certain types of telemedicine utilizing asynchronous store-and-forward technology or electronic monitoring, such as teleradiology or intensive care unit monitoring, it is not medically necessary for an independent examination of the patient to be performed.

A licensee practicing telemedicine is subject to all North Dakota laws governing the adequacy of medical records and the provision of medical records to the patient and other medical providers treating the patient.

A licensee must have the ability to make appropriate referrals of patients not amenable to diagnosis or complete treatment through a telemedicine encounter, including a patient in need of emergent care or complementary in-person care.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 354, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

43-17-45.
Prescribing — Controlled substances.

A licensee who has performed a telemedicine examination or evaluation meeting the requirements of this chapter may prescribe medications according to the licensee’s professional discretion and judgment. Opioids may only be prescribed through telemedicine if prescribed as a federal food and drug administration approved medication assisted treatment for opioid use disorder or to a patient in a hospital or long-term care facility. Opioids may not be prescribed through a telemedicine encounter for any other purpose.

A licensee who, pursuant to this chapter, prescribes a controlled substance, as defined by North Dakota law, shall comply with all state and federal laws regarding the prescribing of a controlled substance, and shall participate in the North Dakota prescription drug monitoring program.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 354, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

43-17-46.
Payment of fees under the interstate medical licensure compact.

Fees levied under subsection 1 of article XIII of the interstate medical licensure compact by the interstate medical licensure compact commission to the state of North Dakota must be paid by the board through the board’s funding mechanism, and the board may not request funds deposited in the general fund for the fee.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 357, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.